New York, session 2025-2026, S8772.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (n) of section 3216 of the insurance law, as 2 added by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the insurance law relat- 3 ing to high deductible health plans and health savings accounts, as 4 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 6895-A and A. 5367-A, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 (n) With respect to high deductible health plans offered in conjunc- 7 tion with a [health reimbursement account or a] health savings account, 8 if application of any cost sharing requirements would result in health 9 savings account ineligibility under section two hundred twenty-three of 10 the internal revenue code, such [cost sharing requirement shall apply 11 for health savings account-qualified high deductible health plans with 12 respect to the deductible of such a plan, only after the enrollee has 13 satisfied the minimum deductible under section two hundred twenty-three 14 of the internal revenue code, except with respect to items or services 15 that are considered preventive care pursuant to subparagraph (C) of 16 paragraph two of subsection c of section two hundred twenty-three of the 17 internal revenue code, in which case the cost-sharing requirements of 18 this section shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible 19 required under section two hundred twenty-three of the internal revenue 20 code has been satisfied] coverage may be subject to the plan's annual 21 deductible. 22 § 2. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 11 of subsection (i) of section 23 3216 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 424 of the laws of 24 2024, is amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07833-06-6 S. 8772 2 1 (B) Such coverage required pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of this 2 paragraph shall not be subject to annual deductibles or coinsurance. If 3 under federal law, application of this requirement would result in 4 health savings account ineligibility under 26 USC 223, this requirement 5 shall apply for health savings account-qualified high deductible health 6 plans with respect to the deductible of such a plan after the enrollee 7 has satisfied the [minimum] plan deductible [under 26 USC 223], except 8 for with respect to items or services that are preventive care pursuant 9 to 26 USC 223(c)(2)(C), in which case the requirements of this paragraph 10 shall apply regardless of whether the [minimum] plan deductible [under 11 26 USC 223] has been satisfied. 12 § 3. Paragraph 37 of subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance 13 law, as amended by chapter 117 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 14 as follows: 15 (37) Any policy that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall 16 apply any third-party payments, financial assistance, discount, voucher 17 or other price reduction instrument for out-of-pocket expenses made on 18 behalf of an insured individual for the cost of a prescription drug to 19 the insured's deductible, copayment, coinsurance, out-of-pocket maximum, 20 or any other cost-sharing requirement when calculating such insured 21 individual's overall contribution to any out-of-pocket maximum or any 22 cost-sharing requirement. If under federal law, application of this 23 requirement would result in health savings account ineligibility under 24 26 USC 223, this requirement shall apply for health savings account-qua- 25 lified high deductible health plans with respect to the deductible of 26 such a plan after the enrollee has satisfied the [minimum] plan deduct- 27 ible [under 26 USC 223], except for with respect to items or services 28 that are preventive care pursuant to 26 USC 223(c)(2)(C), in which case 29 the requirements of this paragraph shall apply regardless of whether the 30 [minimum] plan deductible [under 26 USC 223] has been satisfied. This 31 paragraph only applies to a prescription drug that is either (A) a 32 brand-name drug without an AB rated generic equivalent, as determined by 33 the United States Food and Drug Administration; or (B) a brand-name drug 34 with an AB rated generic equivalent, as determined by the United States 35 Food and Drug Administration, and the insured has access to the brand- 36 name drug through prior authorization by the insurer or through the 37 insurer's appeal process, including any step-therapy process; or (C) a 38 generic drug the insurer will cover, with or without prior authorization 39 or an appeal process. 40 § 4. Subsection (v) of section 3221 of the insurance law, as added by 41 a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the insurance law relating to 42 high deductible health plans and health savings accounts, as proposed in 43 legislative bills numbers S. 6895-A and A. 5367-A, is amended to read as 44 follows: 45 (v) With respect to high deductible health plans offered in conjunc- 46 tion with a [health reimbursement account or a] health savings account, 47 if application of any cost sharing requirements would result in health 48 savings account ineligibility under section two hundred twenty-three of 49 the internal revenue code, such [cost sharing requirement shall apply 50 for health savings account-qualified high deductible health plans with 51 respect to the deductible of such a plan, only after the enrollee has 52 satisfied the minimum deductible under section two hundred twenty-three 53 of the internal revenue code, except with respect to items or services 54 that are considered preventive care pursuant to subparagraph (C) of 55 paragraph two of subsection c of section two hundred twenty-three of the 56 internal revenue code, in which case the cost-sharing requirements of S. 8772 3 1 this section shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible 2 required under section two hundred twenty-three of the internal revenue 3 code has been satisfied] coverage may be subject to the plan's annual 4 deductible. 5 § 5. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 11 of subsection (l) of section 6 3221 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 424 of the laws of 7 2024, is amended to read as follows: 8 (B) Such coverage required pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (C) of this 9 paragraph shall not be subject to annual deductibles or coinsurance. If 10 under federal law, application of this requirement would result in 11 health savings account ineligibility under 26 USC 223, this requirement 12 shall apply for health savings account-qualified high deductible health 13 plans with respect to the deductible of such a plan after the enrollee 14 has satisfied the [minimum] plan deductible [under 26 USC 223], except 15 for with respect to items or services that are preventive care pursuant 16 to 26 USC 223(c)(2)(C), in which case the requirements of this paragraph 17 shall apply regardless of whether the [minimum] plan deductible [under 18 26 USC 223] has been satisfied. 19 § 6. Paragraph 21 of subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance 20 law, as amended by chapter 117 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 21 as follows: 22 (21) Every group or blanket policy delivered or issued for delivery in 23 this state that provides coverage for a prescription drug shall apply 24 any third-party payments, financial assistance, discount, voucher or 25 other price reduction instrument for out-of-pocket expenses made on 26 behalf of an insured individual for the cost of prescription drugs to 27 the insured's deductible, copayment, coinsurance, out-of-pocket maximum, 28 or any other cost-sharing requirement when calculating such insured 29 individual's overall contribution to any out-of-pocket maximum or any 30 cost-sharing requirement. If under federal law, application of this 31 requirement would result in health savings account ineligibility under 32 26 USC 223, this requirement shall apply for health savings account-qua- 33 lified high deductible health plans with respect to the deductible of 34 such a plan after the enrollee has satisfied the [minimum] plan deduct- 35 ible [under 26 USC 223], except for with respect to items or services 36 that are preventive care pursuant to 26 USC 223(c)(2)(C), in which case 37 the requirements of this paragraph shall apply regardless of whether the 38 [minimum] plan deductible [under 26 USC 223] has been satisfied. This 39 paragraph only applies to a prescription drug that is either (A) a 40 brand-name drug without an AB rated generic equivalent, as determined by 41 the United States Food and Drug Administration; or (B) a brand-name drug 42 with an AB rated generic equivalent, as determined by the United States 43 Food and Drug Administration, and the insured has access to the brand- 44 name drug through prior authorization by the insurer or through the 45 insurer's appeal process, including any step-therapy process; or (C) a 46 generic drug the insurer will cover, with or without prior authorization 47 or an appeal process. 48 § 7. Subsection (ww) of section 4303 of the insurance law, as added by 49 a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the insurance law relating to 50 high deductible health plans and health savings accounts, as proposed in 51 legislative bills numbers S. 6895-A and A. 5367-A, is amended to read as 52 follows: 53 [(ww)] (xx) With respect to high deductible health plans offered in 54 conjunction with a [health reimbursement account or a] health savings 55 account, if application of any cost sharing requirements would result in 56 health savings account ineligibility under section two hundred twenty- S. 8772 4 1 three of the internal revenue code, such [cost sharing requirement shall 2 apply for health savings account-qualified high deductible health plans 3 with respect to the deductible of such a plan, only after the enrollee 4 has satisfied the minimum deductible under section two hundred twenty- 5 three of the internal revenue code, except with respect to items or 6 services that are considered preventive care pursuant to subparagraph 7 (C) of paragraph two of subsection c of section two hundred twenty-three 8 of the internal revenue code, in which case the cost-sharing require- 9 ments of this section shall apply regardless of whether the minimum 10 deductible required under section two hundred twenty-three of the inter- 11 nal revenue code has been satisfied] coverage may be subject to the 12 plan's annual deductible. 13 § 8. Subparagraph (F) of paragraph 1 of subsection (p) of section 4303 14 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 424 of the laws of 2024, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 (F) The coverage required in this paragraph or paragraph two of this 17 subsection shall not be subject to annual deductibles or coinsurance. If 18 under federal law, application of this requirement would result in 19 health savings account ineligibility under 26 USC 223, this requirement 20 shall apply for health savings account-qualified high deductible health 21 plans with respect to the deductible of such a plan after the enrollee 22 has satisfied the [minimum] plan deductible [under 26 USC 223], except 23 for with respect to items or services that are preventive care pursuant 24 to 26 USC 223(c)(2)(C), in which case the requirements of this paragraph 25 shall apply regardless of whether the [minimum] plan deductible [under 26 26 USC 223] has been satisfied. 27 § 9. Subsection (tt) of section 4303 of the insurance law, as amended 28 by chapter 117 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 29 (tt) Every contract issued by a medical expense indemnity corporation, 30 hospital service corporation, or health service corporation that 31 provides coverage for a prescription drug shall apply any third-party 32 payments, financial assistance, discount, voucher or other price 33 reduction instrument for out-of-pocket expenses made on behalf of an 34 insured individual for the cost of prescription drugs to the insured's 35 deductible, copayment, coinsurance, out-of-pocket maximum, or any other 36 cost-sharing requirement when calculating such insured individual's 37 overall contribution to any out-of-pocket maximum or any cost-sharing 38 requirement. If under federal law, application of this requirement would 39 result in health savings account ineligibility under 26 USC 223, this 40 requirement shall apply for health savings account-qualified high deduc- 41 tible health plans with respect to the deductible of such a plan after 42 the enrollee has satisfied the [minimum] plan deductible [under 26 USC 43 223], except for with respect to items or services that are preventive 44 care pursuant to 26 USC 223(c)(2)(C), in which case the requirements of 45 this paragraph shall apply regardless of whether the [minimum] plan 46 deductible [under 26 USC 223] has been satisfied. This subsection only 47 applies to a prescription drug that is either (A) a brand-name drug 48 without an AB rated generic equivalent, as determined by the United 49 States Food and Drug Administration; or (B) a brand-name drug with an AB 50 rated generic equivalent, as determined by the United States Food and 51 Drug Administration, and the insured has access to the brand-name drug 52 through prior authorization by the insurer or through the insurer's 53 appeal process, including any step-therapy process; or (C) a generic 54 drug the insurer will cover, with or without prior authorization or an 55 appeal process. S. 8772 5 1 § 10. Section 4 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the insur- 2 ance law relating to high deductible health plans and health savings 3 accounts, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 6895-A and A. 4 5367-A, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 4. This act shall take effect [immediately] January 1, 2027 and 6 apply to all policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered, 7 or amended on or after such date. 8 § 11. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, 9 sections one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, and nine of 10 this act shall take effect on the same date and in the same manner as a 11 chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the insurance law relating to high 12 deductible health plans and health savings accounts, as proposed in 13 legislative bills numbers S. 6895-A and A. 5367-A, takes effect.